A rich woman came, whose husband and sons had died defending the city walls. During the sack
she had fled to her brother in fear. When she returned, she found her house had been turned into a
brothel. The whores had bedecked themselves in her jewels and clothes. She wanted her house back,
and her jewels. ¡°They can keep the clothes,¡± she allowed. Dany granted her the jewels but ruled the
house was lost when she abandoned it.
A former slave came, to accuse a certain noble of the Zhak. The man had recently taken to wife
a freedwoman who had been the noble¡¯s bed-warmer before the city fell. The noble had taken her
maidenhood, used her for his pleasure, and gotten her with child. Her new husband wanted the noble
gelded for the crime of rape, and he wanted a purse of gold as well, to pay him for raising the noble¡¯s
bastard as his own. Dany granted him the gold, but not the gelding. ¡°When he lay with her, your wife
was his property, to do with as he would. By law, there was no rape.¡± Her decision did not please him,
she could see, but if she gelded every man who ever forced a bedslave, she would soon rule a city of
eunuchs.
A boy came, younger than Dany, slight and scarred, dressed up in a frayed grey tokar trailing
silver fringe. His voice broke when he told of how two of his father¡¯s household slaves had risen up the
night the gate broke. One had slain his father, the other his elder brother. Both had raped his mother
before killing her as well. The boy had escaped with no more than the scar upon his face, but one of the
murderers was still living in his father¡¯s house, and the other had joined the queen¡¯s soldiers as one of
the Mother¡¯s Men. He wanted them both hanged.
I am queen over a city built on dust and death. Dany had no choice but to deny him. She had
declared a blanket pardon for all crimes committed during the sack. Nor would she punish slaves for
rising up against their masters.
When she told him, the boy rushed at her, but his feet tangled in his tokar and he went
sprawling headlong on the purple marble. Strong Belwas was on him at once. The huge brown eunuch
yanked him up one-handed and shook him like a mastiff with a rat. ¡°Enough, Belwas,¡± Dany called.
¡°Release him.¡± To the boy she said, ¡°Treasure that tokar, for it saved your life. You are only a boy, so we
will forget what happened here. You should do the same.¡± But as he left the boy looked back over his
shoulder, and when she saw his eyes Dany thought, The Harpy has another Son.
By midday Daenerys was feeling the weight of the crown upon her head, and the hardness of
the bench beneath her. With so many still waiting on her pleasure, she did not stop to eat. Instead she
dispatched Jhiqui to the kitchens for a platter of flatbread, olives, figs, and cheese. She nibbled whilst
she listened, and sipped from a cup of watered wine. The figs were fine, the olives even finer, but the
wine left a tart metallic aftertaste in her mouth. The small pale yellow grapes native to these regions
produced a notably inferior vintage. We shall have no trade in wine. Besides, the Great Masters had
burned the best arbors along with the olive trees.
In the afternoon a sculptor came, proposing to replace the head of the great bronze harpy in the
Plaza of Purification with one cast in Dany¡¯s image. She denied him with as much courtesy as she could
muster. A pike of unprecedented size had been caught in the Skahazadhan, and the fisherman wished to
give it to the queen. She admired the fish extravagantly, rewarded the fisherman with a purse of silver,
and sent the pike to her kitchens. A coppersmith had fashioned her a suit of burnished rings to wear to
war. She accepted it with fulsome thanks; it was lovely to behold, and all that burnished copper would
flash prettily in the sun, though if actual battle threatened, she would sooner be clad in steel. Even a
young girl who knew nothing of the ways of war knew that.
The slippers the Butcher King had sent her had grown too uncomfortable. Dany kicked them off
and sat with one foot tucked beneath her and the other swinging back and forth. It was not a very regal
pose, but she was tired of being regal. The crown had given her a headache, and her buttocks had gone
to sleep. ¡°Ser Barristan,¡± she called, ¡°I know what quality a king needs most.¡±
¡°Courage, Your Grace?¡±
¡°Cheeks like iron,¡± she teased. ¡°All I do is sit.¡±
¡°Your Grace takes too much on herself. You should allow your councillors to shoulder more of
your burdens.¡±
¡°I have too many councillors and too few cushions.¡± Dany turned to Reznak. ¡°How many more?¡±
¡° Three-and-twenty, if it please Your Magnificence. With as many claims.¡± The seneschal
consulted some papers. ¡°One calf and three goats. The rest will be sheep or lambs, no doubt.¡±
¡° Three-and-twenty.¡± Dany sighed. ¡°My dragons have developed a prodigious taste for mutton
since we began to pay the shepherds for their kills. Have these claims been proven?¡±
¡°Some men have brought burnt bones.¡±
¡°Men make fires. Men cook mutton. Burnt bones prove nothing. Brown Ben says there are red
wolves in the hills outside the city, and jack-als and wild dogs. Must we pay good silver for every lamb
that goes astray between Yunkai and the Skahazadhan?¡±
¡°No, Magnificence.¡± Reznak bowed. ¡°Shall I send these rascals away, or will you want them
scourged?¡±
Daenerys shifted on the bench. ¡°No man should ever fear to come to me.¡± Some claims were
false, she did not doubt, but more were genuine. Her dragons had grown too large to be content with
rats and cats and dogs. The more they eat, the larger they will grow, Ser Barristan had warned her, and
the larger they grow, the more they¡¯ll eat. Drogon especially ranged far afield and could easily devour a
sheep a day. ¡°Pay them for the value of their animals,¡± she told Reznak, ¡°but henceforth claimants must
present themselves at the Temple of the Graces and swear a holy oath before the gods of Ghis.¡±
¡°It shall be done.¡± Reznak turned to the petitioners. ¡°Her Magnificence the Queen has
consented to compensate each of you for the animals you have lost,¡± he told them in the Ghiscari
tongue. ¡°Present yourselves to my factors on the morrow, and you shall be paid in coin or kind, as you
prefer.¡±
The pronouncement was received in sullen silence. You would think they might be happier, Dany
thought. They have what they came for. Is there no way to please these people?
One man lingered behind as the rest were filing out¡ªa squat man with a windburnt face,
shabbily dressed. His hair was a cap of coarse red-black wire cropped about his ears, and in one hand he
held a sad cloth sack. He stood with his head down, gazing at the marble floor as if he had quite
forgotten where he was. And what does this one want? Dany wondered.
¡°All kneel for Daenerys Stormborn, the Unburnt, Queen of Meereen, Queen of the Andals and the
Rhoynar and the First Men, Khaleesi of Great Grass Sea, Breaker of Shackles, and Mother of Dragons,¡±
cried Missandei in her high, sweet voice.
As Dany stood, her tokar began to slip. She caught it and tugged it back in place. ¡°You with the
sack,¡± she called, ¡°did you wish to speak with us? You may approach.¡±
When he raised his head, his eyes were red and raw as open sores. Dany glimpsed Ser Barristan
sliding closer, a white shadow at her side. The man approached in a stumbling shuffle, one step and then
another, clutching his sack. Is he drunk, or ill? she wondered. There was dirt beneath his cracked yellow
fingernails.
¡°What is it?¡± Dany asked. ¡°Do you have some grievance to lay before us, some petition? What
would you have of us?¡±
His tongue flicked nervously over chapped, cracked lips. ¡°I ¡­ I brought ¡­¡±
¡°Bones?¡± she said, impatiently. ¡°Burnt bones?¡±
He lifted the sack, and spilled its contents on the marble.
Bones they were, broken bones and blackened. The longer ones had been cracked open for their
marrow.
¡°It were the black one,¡± the man said, in a Ghiscari growl, ¡°the winged shadow. He come down
from the sky and ¡­ and ¡­¡±
No. Dany shivered. No, no, oh no.
¡°Are you deaf, fool?¡± Reznak mo Reznak demanded of the man. ¡°Did you not hear my
pronouncement? See my factors on the morrow, and you shall be paid for your sheep.¡±
¡°Reznak,¡± Ser Barristan said quietly, ¡°hold your tongue and open your eyes. Those are no sheep
bones.¡±
No, Dany thought, those are the bones of a child.
JON
The white wolf raced through a black wood, beneath a pale cliff as tall as the sky. The moon ran
with him, slipping through a tangle of bare branches overhead, across the starry sky.
¡°Snow,¡± the moon murmured. The wolf made no answer. Snow crunched beneath his paws. The
wind sighed through the trees.
Far off, he could hear his packmates calling to him, like to like. They were hunting too. A wild
rain lashed down upon his black brother as he tore at the flesh of an enormous goat, washing the blood
from his side where the goat¡¯s long horn had raked him. In another place, his little sister lifted her head
to sing to the moon, and a hundred small grey cousins broke off their hunt to sing with her. The hills
were warmer where they were, and full of food. Many a night his sister¡¯s pack gorged on the flesh of
sheep and cows and horses, the prey of men, and sometimes even on the flesh of man himself.
¡°Snow,¡± the moon called down again, cackling. The white wolf padded along the man trail
beneath the icy cliff. The taste of blood was on his tongue, and his ears rang to the song of the hundred
cousins. Once they had been six, five whimpering blind in the snow beside their dead mother, sucking
cool milk from her hard dead nipples whilst he crawled off alone. Four remained ¡­ and one the white
wolf could no longer sense.
¡°Snow,¡± the moon insisted.
The white wolf ran from it, racing toward the cave of night where the sun had hidden, his breath
frosting in the air. On starless nights the great cliff was as black as stone, a darkness towering high above
the wide world, but when the moon came out it shimmered pale and icy as a frozen stream. The wolf¡¯s
pelt was thick and shaggy, but when the wind blew along the ice no fur could keep the chill out. On the
other side the wind was colder still, the wolf sensed. That was where his brother was, the grey brother
who smelled of summer.
¡°Snow.¡± An icicle tumbled from a branch. The white wolf turned and bared his teeth. ¡°Snow!¡±
His fur rose bristling, as the woods dissolved around him. ¡°Snow, snow, snow!¡± He heard the beat of
wings. Through the gloom a raven flew.
It landed on Jon Snow¡¯s chest with a thump and a scrabbling of claws. ¡°SNOW!¡± it screamed into
his face.
¡°I hear you.¡± The room was dim, his pallet hard. Grey light leaked through the shutters,
promising another bleak cold day. ¡°Is this how you woke Mormont? Get your feathers out of my face.¡±
Jon wriggled an arm out from under his blankets to shoo the raven off. It was a big bird, old and bold
and scruffy, utterly without fear. ¡°Snow,¡± it cried, flapping to his bedpost. ¡°Snow, snow.¡± Jon filled his
fist with a pillow and let fly, but the bird took to the air. The pillow struck the wall and burst, scattering
stuffing everywhere just as Dolorous Edd Tollett poked his head through the door. ¡°Beg pardon,¡± he
said, ignoring the flurry of feathers, ¡°shall I fetch m¡¯lord some breakfast?¡±
¡°Corn,¡± cried the raven. ¡°Corn, corn.¡±
¡°Roast raven,¡± Jon suggested. ¡°And half a pint of ale.¡± Having a steward fetch and serve for him
still felt strange; not long ago, it would have been him fetching breakfast for Lord Commander
Mormont.
¡°Three corns and one roast raven,¡± said Dolorous Edd. ¡°Very good, m¡¯lord, only Hobb¡¯s made
boiled eggs, black sausage, and apples stewed with prunes. The apples stewed with prunes are
excellent, except for the prunes. I won¡¯t eat prunes myself. Well, there was one time when Hobb
chopped them up with chestnuts and carrots and hid them in a hen. Never trust a cook, my lord. They¡¯ll
prune you when you least expect it.¡±
¡°Later.¡± Breakfast could wait; Stannis could not. ¡°Any trouble from the stockades last night?¡±
¡°Not since you put guards on the guards, m¡¯lord.¡±
¡°Good.¡± A thousand wildlings had been penned up beyond the Wall, the captives Stannis
Baratheon had taken when his knights had smashed Mance Rayder¡¯s patchwork host. Many of the
prisoners were women, and some of the guards had been sneaking them out to warm their beds. King¡¯s
men, queen¡¯s men, it did not seem to matter; a few black brothers had tried the same thing. Men were
men, and these were the only women for a thousand leagues.
¡°Two more wildlings turned up to surrender,¡± Edd went on. ¡°A mother with a girl clinging to her
skirts. She had a boy babe too, all swaddled up in fur, but he was dead.¡±
¡°Dead,¡± said the raven. It was one of the bird¡¯s favorite words. ¡°Dead, dead, dead.¡±
They had free folk drifting in most every night, starved half-frozen creatures who had run from
the battle beneath the Wall only to crawl back when they realized there was no safe place to run to.
¡°Was the mother questioned?¡± Jon asked. Stannis Baratheon had smashed Mance Rayder¡¯s host and
made the King-Beyond-the-Wall his captive ¡­ but the wildlings were still out there, the Weeper and
Tormund Giantsbane and thousands more.
¡°Aye, m¡¯lord,¡± said Edd, ¡°but all she knows is that she ran off during the battle and hid in the
woods after. We filled her full of porridge, sent her to the pens, and burned the babe.¡±
Burning dead children had ceased to trouble Jon Snow; live ones were another matter. Two
kings to wake the dragon. The father first and then the son, so both die kings. The words had been
murmured by one of the queen¡¯s men as Maester Aemon had cleaned his wounds. Jon had tried to
dismiss them as his fever talking. Aemon had demurred. ¡°There is power in a king¡¯s blood,¡± the old
maester had warned, ¡°and better men than Stannis have done worse things than this.¡± The king can be
harsh and unforgiving, aye, but a babe still on the breast? Only a monster would give a living child to the
flames.
Jon pissed in darkness, filling his chamber pot as the Old Bear¡¯s raven muttered complaints. The
wolf dreams had been growing stronger, and he found himself remembering them even when awake.
Ghost knows that Grey Wind is dead. Robb had died at the Twins, betrayed by men he¡¯d believed his
friends, and his wolf had perished with him. Bran and Rickon had been murdered too, beheaded at the
behest of Theon Greyjoy, who had once been their lord father¡¯s ward ¡­ but if dreams did not lie, their
direwolves had escaped. At Queenscrown, one had come out of the darkness to save Jon¡¯s life. Summer,
it had to be. His fur was grey, and Shaggydog is black. He wondered if some part of his dead brothers
lived on inside their wolves.
He filled his basin from the flagon of water beside his bed, washed his face and hands, donned a
clean set of black woolens, laced up a black leather jerkin, and pulled on a pair of well-worn boots.
Mormont¡¯s raven watched with shrewd black eyes, then fluttered to the window. ¡°Do you take me for
your thrall?¡± When Jon folded back the window with its thick diamond-shaped panes of yellow glass, the
chill of the morning hit him in the face. He took a breath to clear away the cobwebs of the night as the
raven flapped away. That bird is too clever by half. It had been the Old Bear¡¯s companion for long years,
but that had not stopped it from eating Mormont¡¯s face once he died.
Outside his bedchamber a flight of steps descended to a larger room furnished with a scarred
pinewood table and a dozen oak-and-leather chairs. With Stannis in the King¡¯s Tower and the Lord
Commander¡¯s Tower burned to a shell, Jon had established himself in Donal Noye¡¯s modest rooms
behind the armory. In time, no doubt, he would need larger quarters, but for the moment these would
serve whilst he accustomed himself to command.
The grant that the king had presented him for signature was on the table beneath a silver
drinking cup that had once been Donal Noye¡¯s. The one-armed smith had left few personal effects: the
cup, six pennies and a copper star, a niello brooch with a broken clasp, a musty brocade doublet that
bore the stag of Storm¡¯s End. His treasures were his tools, and the swords and knives he made. His life
was at the forge. Jon moved the cup aside and read the parchment once again. If I put my seal to this, I
will forever be remembered as the lord commander who gave away the Wall, he thought, but if I should
refuse ¡­
Stannis Baratheon was proving to be a prickly guest, and a restless one. He had ridden down the
kingsroad almost as far as Queenscrown, prowled through the empty hovels of Mole¡¯s Town, inspected
the ruined forts at Queensgate and Oakenshield. Each night he walked atop the Wall with Lady
Melisandre, and during the days he visited the stockades, picking captives out for the red woman to
question. He does not like to be balked. This would not be a pleasant morning, Jon feared.
From the armory came a clatter of shields and swords, as the latest lot of boys and raw recruits
armed themselves. He could hear the voice of Iron Emmett telling them to be quick about it. Cotter Pyke
had not been pleased to lose him, but the young ranger had a gift for training men. He loves to fight, and
he¡¯ll teach his boys to love it too. Or so he hoped.
Jon¡¯s cloak hung on a peg by the door, his sword belt on another. He donned them both and
made his way to the armory. The rug where Ghost slept was empty, he saw. Two guardsmen stood
inside the doors, clad in black cloaks and iron halfhelms, spears in their hands. ¡°Will m¡¯lord be wanting a
tail?¡± asked Garse.
¡°I think I can find the King¡¯s Tower by myself.¡± Jon hated having guards trailing after him
everywhere he went. It made him feel like a mother duck leading a procession of ducklings.
Iron Emmett¡¯s lads were well at it in the yard, blunted swords slamming into shields and ringing
against one another. Jon stopped to watch a moment as Horse pressed Hop-Robin back toward the well.
Horse had the makings of a good fighter, he decided. He was strong and getting stronger, and his
instincts were sound. Hop-Robin was another tale. His clubfoot was bad enough, but he was afraid of
getting hit as well. Perhaps we can make a steward of him. The fight ended abruptly, with Hop-Robin on
the ground.
¡°Well fought,¡± Jon said to Horse, ¡°but you drop your shield too low when pressing an attack. You
will want to correct that, or it is like to get you killed.¡±
¡°Yes, m¡¯lord. I¡¯ll keep it higher next time.¡± Horse pulled Hop-Robin to his feet, and the smaller
boy made a clumsy bow.
A few of Stannis¡¯s knights were sparring on the far side of the yard. King¡¯s men in one corner and
queen¡¯s men in another, Jon did not fail to note, but only a few. It¡¯s too cold for most of them. As he
strode past them, a booming voice called after him. ¡°BOY! YOU THERE! BOY!¡±
Boy was not the worst of the things that Jon Snow had been called since being chosen lord
commander. He ignored it.
¡°Snow,¡± the voice insisted, ¡°Lord Commander.¡±
This time he stopped. ¡°Ser?¡±
The knight overtopped him by six inches. ¡°A man who bears Valyrian steel should use it for more
than scratching his arse.¡±
Jon had seen this one about the castle¡ªa knight of great renown, to hear him tell it. During the
battle beneath the Wall, Ser Godry Farring had slain a fleeing giant, pounding after him on horseback
and driving a lance through his back, then dismounting to hack off the creature¡¯s pitiful small head. The
queen¡¯s men had taken to calling him Godry the Giantslayer.
Jon remembered Ygritte, crying. I am the last of the giants. ¡°I use Longclaw when I must, ser.¡±
¡°How well, though?¡± Ser Godry drew his own blade. ¡°Show us. I promise not to hurt you, lad.¡±
How kind of you. ¡°Some other time, ser. I fear that I have other duties just now.¡±
¡°You fear. I see that.¡± Ser Godry grinned at his friends. ¡°He fears,¡± he repeated, for the slow
ones.
¡°You will excuse me.¡± Jon showed them his back.
Castle Black seemed a bleak and forlorn place in the pale dawn light. My command, Jon Snow
reflected ruefully, as much a ruin as it is a strong-hold. The Lord Commander¡¯s Tower was a shell, the
Common Hall a pile of blackened timbers, and Hardin¡¯s Tower looked as if the next gust of wind would
knock it over ¡­ though it had looked that way for years. Behind them rose the Wall: immense,
forbidding, frigid, acrawl with builders pushing up a new switchback stair to join the remnants of the old.
They worked from dawn to dusk. Without the stair, there was no way to reach the top of the Wall save
by winch. That would not serve if the wildlings should attack again.
Above the King¡¯s Tower the great golden battle standard of House Baratheon cracked like a whip
from the roof where Jon Snow had prowled with bow in hand not long ago, slaying Thenns and free folk
beside Satin and Deaf Dick Follard. Two queen¡¯s men stood shivering on the steps, their hands tucked up
into their armpits and their spears leaning against the door. ¡°Those cloth gloves will never serve,¡± Jon
told them. ¡°See Bowen Marsh on the morrow, and he¡¯ll give you each a pair of leather gloves lined with
fur.¡±
¡°We will, m¡¯lord, and thank you,¡± said the older guard.
¡°That¡¯s if our bloody hands aren¡¯t froze off,¡± the younger added, his breath a pale mist. ¡°I used
to think that it got cold up in the Dornish Marches. What did I know?¡±
Nothing, thought Jon Snow, the same as me.
Halfway up the winding steps, he came upon Samwell Tarly, headed down. ¡°Are you coming
from the king?¡± Jon asked him.
¡°Maester Aemon sent me with a letter.¡±
¡°I see.¡± Some lords trusted their maesters to read their letters and convey the contents, but
Stannis insisted on breaking the seals himself. ¡°How did Stannis take it?¡±
¡°Not happily, by his face.¡± Sam dropped his voice to a whisper. ¡°I am not supposed to speak of
it.¡±
¡°Then don¡¯t.¡± Jon wondered which of his father¡¯s bannermen had refused King Stannis homage
this time. He was quick enough to spread the word when Karhold declared for him. ¡°How are you and
your longbow getting on?¡±
¡°I found a good book about archery.¡± Sam frowned. ¡°Doing it is harder than reading about it,
though. I get blisters.¡±
¡°Keep at it. We may need your bow on the Wall if the Others turn up some dark night.¡±
¡°Oh, I hope not.¡±
More guards stood outside the king¡¯s solar. ¡°No arms are allowed in His Grace¡¯s presence, my
lord,¡± their serjeant said. ¡°I¡¯ll need that sword. Your knives as well.¡± It would do no good to protest, Jon
knew. He handed them his weaponry.
Within the solar the air was warm. Lady Melisandre was seated near the fire, her ruby
glimmering against the pale skin of her throat. Ygritte had been kissed by fire; the red priestess was fire,
and her hair was blood and flame. Stannis stood behind the rough-hewn table where the Old Bear had
once been wont to sit and take his meals. Covering the table was a large map of the north, painted on a
ragged piece of hide. A tallow candle weighed down one end of it, a steel gauntlet the other.
The king wore lambswool breeches and a quilted doublet, yet somehow he looked as stiff and
uncomfortable as if he had been clad in plate and mail. His skin was pale leather, his beard cropped so
short that it might have been painted on. A fringe about his temples was all that remained of his black
hair. In his hand was a parchment with a broken seal of dark green wax.
Jon took a knee. The king frowned at him, and rattled the parchment angrily. ¡°Rise. Tell me, who
is Lyanna Mormont?¡±
¡°One of Lady Maege¡¯s daughters, Sire. The youngest. She was named for my lord father¡¯s sister.¡±
¡°To curry your lord father¡¯s favor, I don¡¯t doubt. I know how that game is played. How old is this
wretched girl child?¡±
Jon had to think a moment. ¡°Ten. Or near enough to make no matter. Might I know how she has
offended Your Grace?¡±
Stannis read from the letter. ¡°Bear Island knows no king but the King in the North, whose name
is STARK. A girl of ten, you say, and she presumes to scold her lawful king.¡± His close-cropped beard lay
like a shadow over his hollow cheeks. ¡°See that you keep these tidings to yourself, Lord Snow. Karhold is
with me, that is all the men need know. I will not have your brothers trading tales of how this child spat
on me.¡±
¡°As you command, Sire.¡± Maege Mormont had ridden south with Robb, Jon knew. Her eldest
daughter had joined the Young Wolf¡¯s host as well. Even if both of them had died, however, Lady Maege
had other daughters, some with children of their own. Had they gone with Robb as well? Surely Lady
Maege would have left at least one of the older girls behind as castellan. He did not understand why
Lyanna should be writing Stannis, and could not help but wonder if the girl¡¯s answer might have been
different if the letter had been sealed with a direwolf instead of a crowned stag, and signed by Jon Stark,
Lord of Winterfell. It is too late for such misgivings. You made your choice.
¡°Two score ravens were sent out,¡± the king complained, ¡°yet we get no response but silence and
defiance. Homage is the duty every leal subject owes his king. Yet your father¡¯s bannermen all turn their
back on me, save the Karstarks. Is Arnolf Karstark the only man of honor in the north?¡±
Arnolf Karstark was the late Lord Rickard¡¯s uncle. He had been made the castellan of Karhold
when his nephew and his sons went south with Robb, and he had been the first to respond to King
Stannis¡¯s call for homage, with a raven declaring his allegiance. The Karstarks have no other choice, Jon
might have said. Rickard Karstark had betrayed the direwolf and spilled the blood of lions. The stag was
Karhold¡¯s only hope. ¡°In times as confused as these, even men of honor must wonder where their duty
lies. Your Grace is not the only king in the realm demanding homage.¡±
Lady Melisandre stirred. ¡°Tell me, Lord Snow ¡­ where were these other kings when the wild
people stormed your Wall?¡±
¡°A thousand leagues away and deaf to our need,¡± Jon replied. ¡°I have not forgotten that, my
lady. Nor will I. But my father¡¯s bannermen have wives and children to protect, and smallfolk who will
die should they choose wrongly. His Grace asks much of them. Give them time, and you will have your
answers.¡±
¡°Answers such as this?¡± Stannis crushed Lyanna¡¯s letter in his fist.
¡°Even in the north men fear the wroth of Tywin Lannister. Boltons make bad enemies as well. It
is not happenstance that put a flayed man on their banners. They north rode with Robb, bled with him,
died for him. They have supped on grief and death, and now you come to offer them another serving.
Do you blame them if they hang back? Forgive me, Your Grace, but some will look at you and see only
another doomed pretender.¡±
¡°If His Grace is doomed, your realm is doomed as well,¡± said Lady Melisandre. ¡°Remember that,
Lord Snow. It is the one true king of Westeros who stands before you.¡±
Jon kept his face a mask. ¡°As you say, my lady.¡±
Stannis snorted. ¡°You spend your words as if every one were a golden dragon. I wonder, how
much gold do you have laid by?¡±
¡°Gold?¡± Are those the dragons the red woman means to wake? Dragons made of gold? ¡°Such
taxes as we collect are paid in kind, Your Grace. The Watch is rich in turnips but poor in coin.¡±
¡°Turnips are not like to appease Salladhor Saan. I require gold or silver.¡±
¡°For that, you need White Harbor. The city cannot compare to Old-town or King¡¯s Landing, but it
is still a thriving port. Lord Manderly is the richest of my lord father¡¯s bannermen.¡±
¡°Lord Too-Fat-to-Sit-a-Horse.¡± The letter that Lord Wyman Manderly had sent back from White
Harbor had spoken of his age and infirmity, and little more. Stannis had commanded Jon not to speak of
that one either.
¡°Perhaps his lordship would fancy a wildling wife,¡± said Lady Melisandre. ¡°Is this fat man
married, Lord Snow?¡±
¡°His lady wife is long dead. Lord Wyman has two grown sons, and grandchildren by the elder.
And he is too fat to sit a horse, thirty stone at least. Val would never have him.¡±
¡°Just once you might try to give me an answer that would please me, Lord Snow,¡± the king
grumbled.
¡°I would hope the truth would please you, Sire. Your men call Val a princess, but to the free folk
she is only the sister of their king¡¯s dead wife. If you force her to marry a man she does not want, she is
like to slit his throat on their wedding night. Even if she accepts her husband, that does not mean the
wildlings will follow him, or you. The only man who can bind them to your cause is Mance Rayder.¡±
¡°I know that,¡± Stannis said, unhappily. ¡°I have spent hours speaking with the man. He knows
much and more of our true enemy, and there is cunning in him, I¡¯ll grant you. Even if he were to
renounce his kingship, though, the man remains an oathbreaker. Suffer one deserter to live, and you
encourage others to desert. No. Laws should be made of iron, not of pudding. Mance Rayder¡¯s life is
forfeit by every law of the Seven Kingdoms.¡±
¡°The law ends at the Wall, Your Grace. You could make good use of Mance.¡±
¡°I mean to. I¡¯ll burn him, and the north will see how I deal with turncloaks and traitors. I have
other men to lead the wildlings. And I have Rayder¡¯s son, do not forget. Once the father dies, his whelp
will be the King-Beyond-the-Wall.¡±
¡°Your Grace is mistaken.¡± You know nothing, Jon Snow, Ygritte used to say, but he had learned.
¡°The babe is no more a prince than Val is a princess. You do not become King-Beyond-the-Wall because
your father was.¡±
¡°Good,¡± said Stannis, ¡°for I will suffer no other kings in Westeros. Have you signed the grant?¡±
¡°No, Your Grace.¡± And now it comes. Jon closed his burned fingers and opened them again. ¡°You
ask too much.¡±
¡°Ask? I asked you to be Lord of Winterfell and Warden of the North. I require these castles.¡±
¡°We have ceded you the Nightfort.¡±
¡°Rats and ruins. It is a niggard¡¯s gift that costs the giver nothing. Your own man Yarwyck says it
will be half a year before the castle can be made fit for habitation.¡±
¡°The other forts are no better.¡±
¡°I know that. It makes no matter. They are all we have. There are nineteen forts along the Wall,
and you have men in only three of them. I mean to have every one of them garrisoned again before the
year is out.¡±
¡°I have no quarrel with that, Sire, but it is being said that you also mean to grant these castles to
your knights and lords, to hold as their own seats as vassals to Your Grace.¡±
¡°Kings are expected to be open-handed to their followers. Did Lord Eddard teach his bastard
nothing? Many of my knights and lords abandoned rich lands and stout castles in the south. Should their
loyalty go unrewarded?¡±
¡°If Your Grace wishes to lose all of my lord father¡¯s bannermen, there is no more certain way
than by giving northern halls to southron lords.¡±
¡°How can I lose men I do not have? I had hoped to bestow Winterfell on a northman, you may
recall. A son of Eddard Stark. He threw my offer in my face.¡± Stannis Baratheon with a grievance was like
a mastiff with a bone; he gnawed it down to splinters.
¡°By right Winterfell should go to my sister Sansa.¡±
¡°Lady Lannister, you mean? Are you so eager to see the Imp perched on your father¡¯s seat? I
promise you, that will not happen whilst I live, Lord Snow.¡±
Jon knew better than to press the point. ¡°Sire, some claim that you mean to grant lands and
castles to Rattleshirt and the Magnar of Thenn.¡±
¡°Who told you that?¡±
The talk was all over Castle Black. ¡°If you must know, I had the tale from Gilly.¡±
¡°Who is Gilly?¡±
¡°The wet nurse,¡± said Lady Melisandre. ¡°Your Grace gave her freedom of the castle.¡±
¡°Not for running tales. She¡¯s wanted for her teats, not for her tongue. I¡¯ll have more milk from
her, and fewer messages.¡±
¡°Castle Black needs no useless mouths,¡± Jon agreed. ¡°I am sending Gilly south on the next ship
out of Eastwatch.¡±
Melisandre touched the ruby at her neck. ¡°Gilly is giving suck to Dalla¡¯s son as well as her own. It
seems cruel of you to part our little prince from his milk brother, my lord.¡±
Careful now, careful. ¡°Mother¡¯s milk is all they share. Gilly¡¯s son is larger and more robust. He
kicks the prince and pinches him, and shoves him from the breast. Craster was his father, a cruel man
and greedy, and blood tells.¡±
The king was confused. ¡°I thought the wet nurse was this man Craster¡¯s daughter?¡±
¡°Wife and daughter both, Your Grace. Craster married all his daughters. Gilly¡¯s boy was the fruit
of their union.¡±
¡°Her own father got this child on her?¡± Stannis sounded shocked. ¡°We are well rid of her, then. I
will not suffer such abominations here. This is not King¡¯s Landing.¡±
¡°I can find another wet nurse. If there¡¯s none amongst the wildlings, I will send to the mountain
clans. Until such time, goat¡¯s milk should suffice for the boy, if it please Your Grace.¡±
¡°Poor fare for a prince ¡­ but better than whore¡¯s milk, aye.¡± Stannis drummed his fingers on the
map. ¡°If we may return to the matter of these forts ¡­¡±
¡°Your Grace,¡± said Jon, with chilly courtesy, ¡°I have housed your men and fed them, at dire cost
to our winter stores. I have clothed them so they would not freeze.¡±
Stannis was not appeased. ¡°Aye, you¡¯ve shared your salt pork and porridge, and you¡¯ve thrown
us some black rags to keep us warm. Rags the wildlings would have taken off your corpses if I had not
come north.¡±
Jon ignored that. ¡°I have given you fodder for your horses, and once the stair is done I will lend
you builders to restore the Nightfort. I have even agreed to allow you to settle wildlings on the Gift,
which was given to the Night¡¯s Watch in perpetuity.¡±
¡°You offer me empty lands and desolations, yet deny me the castles I require to reward my lords
and bannermen.¡±
¡°The Night¡¯s Watch built those castles ¡­¡±
¡°And the Night¡¯s Watch abandoned them.¡±
¡°¡­ to defend the Wall,¡± Jon finished stubbornly, ¡°not as seats for southron lords. The stones of
those forts are mortared with the blood and bones of my brothers, long dead. I cannot give them to
you.¡±
¡°Cannot or will not?¡± The cords in the king¡¯s neck stood out sharp as swords. ¡°I offered you a
name.¡±
¡°I have a name, Your Grace.¡±
¡°Snow. Was ever a name more ill-omened?¡± Stannis touched his sword hilt. ¡°Just who do you
imagine that you are?¡±
¡°The watcher on the walls. The sword in the darkness.¡±
¡°Don¡¯t prate your words at me.¡± Stannis drew the blade he called Lightbringer. ¡°Here is your
sword in the darkness.¡± Light rippled up and down the blade, now red, now yellow, now orange,
painting the king¡¯s face in harsh, bright hues. ¡°Even a green boy should be able to see that. Are you
blind?¡±
¡°No, Sire. I agree these castles must be garrisoned¡ª¡±
¡°The boy commander agrees. How fortunate.¡±
¡°¡ªby the Night¡¯s Watch.¡±
¡°You do not have the men.¡±
¡°Then give me men, Sire. I will provide officers for each of the abandoned forts, seasoned
commanders who know the Wall and the lands beyond, and how best to survive the coming winter. In
return for all we¡¯ve given you, grant me the men to fill out the garrisons. Men-at-arms, cross-bowmen,
raw boys. I will even take your wounded and infirm.¡±
Stannis stared at him incredulously, then gave a bark of laughter. ¡°You are bold enough, Snow, I
grant you that, but you¡¯re mad if you think my men will take the black.¡±
¡°They can wear any color cloak they choose, so long as they obey my officers as they would your
own.¡±
The king was unmoved. ¡°I have knights and lords in my service, scions of noble Houses old in
honor. They cannot be expected to serve under poachers, peasants, and murderers.¡±
Or bastards, Sire? ¡°Your own Hand is a smuggler.¡±
¡°Was a smuggler. I shortened his fingers for that. They tell me that you are the
nine-hundred-ninety-eighth man to command the Night¡¯s Watch, Lord Snow. What do you think the
nine-hundred-ninety-ninth might say about these castles? The sight of your head on a spike might
inspire him to be more helpful.¡± The king laid his bright blade down on the map, along the Wall, its steel
shimmering like sunlight on water. ¡°You are only lord commander by my sufferance. You would do well
to remember that.¡±
¡°I am lord commander because my brothers chose me.¡± There were mornings when Jon Snow
did not quite believe it himself, when he woke up thinking surely this was some mad dream. It¡¯s like
putting on new clothes, Sam had told him. The fit feels strange at first, but once you¡¯ve worn them for a
while you get to feeling comfortable.
¡°Alliser Thorne complains about the manner of your choosing, and I cannot say he does not
have a grievance.¡± The map lay between them like a battleground, drenched by the colors of the
glowing sword. ¡°The count was done by a blind man with your fat friend by his elbow. And Slynt names
you a turncloak.¡±
And who would know one better than Slynt? ¡°A turncloak would tell you what you wished to
hear and betray you later. Your Grace knows that I was fairly chosen. My father always said you were a
just man.¡± Just but harsh had been Lord Eddard¡¯s exact words, but Jon did not think it would be wise to
share that.
¡°Lord Eddard was no friend to me, but he was not without some sense. He would have given me
these castles.¡±
Never. ¡°I cannot speak to what my father might have done. I took an oath, Your Grace. The Wall
is mine.¡±
¡°For now. We will see how well you hold it.¡± Stannis pointed at him. ¡°Keep your ruins, as they
mean so much to you. I promise you, though, if any remain empty when the year is out, I will take them
with your leave or without it. And if even one should fall to the foe, your head will soon follow. Now get
out.¡±
Lady Melisandre rose from her place near the hearth. ¡°With your leave, Sire, I will show Lord
Snow back to his chambers.¡±
¡°Why? He knows the way.¡± Stannis waved them both away. ¡°Do what you will. Devan, food.
Boiled eggs and lemon water.¡±
After the warmth of the king¡¯s solar, the turnpike stair felt bone-chillingly cold. ¡°Wind¡¯s rising,
m¡¯lady,¡± the serjeant warned Melisandre as he handed Jon back his weapons. ¡°You might want a
warmer cloak.¡±
¡°I have my faith to warm me.¡± The red woman walked beside Jon down the steps. ¡°His Grace is
growing fond of you.¡±
¡°I can tell. He only threatened to behead me twice.¡±
Melisandre laughed. ¡°It is his silences you should fear, not his words.¡± As they stepped out into
the yard, the wind filled Jon¡¯s cloak and sent it flapping against her. The red priestess brushed the black
wool aside and slipped her arm through his. ¡°It may be that you are not wrong about the wildling king. I
shall pray for the Lord of Light to send me guidance. When I gaze into the flames, I can see through
stone and earth, and find the truth within men¡¯s souls. I can speak to kings long dead and children not
yet born, and watch the years and seasons flicker past, until the end of days.¡±
¡°Are your fires never wrong?¡±
¡°Never ¡­ though we priests are mortal and sometimes err, mistaking this must come for this
may come.¡±
Jon could feel her heat, even through his wool and boiled leather. The sight of them arm in arm
was drawing curious looks. They will be whispering in the barracks tonight. ¡°If you can truly see the
morrow in your flames, tell me when and where the next wildling attack will come.¡± He slipped his arm
free.
¡°R¡¯hllor sends us what visions he will, but I shall seek for this man Tormund in the flames.¡±
Melisandre¡¯s red lips curled into a smile. ¡°I have seen you in my fires, Jon Snow.¡±
¡°Is that a threat, my lady? Do you mean to burn me too?¡±
¡°You mistake my meaning.¡± She gave him a searching look. ¡°I fear that I make you uneasy, Lord
Snow.¡±
Jon did not deny it. ¡°The Wall is no place for a woman.¡±
¡°You are wrong. I have dreamed of your Wall, Jon Snow. Great was the lore that raised it, and
great the spells locked beneath its ice. We walk beneath one of the hinges of the world.¡± Melisandre
gazed up at it, her breath a warm moist cloud in the air. ¡°This is my place as it is yours, and soon enough
you may have grave need of me. Do not refuse my friendship, Jon. I have seen you in the storm,
hard-pressed, with enemies on every side. You have so many enemies. Shall I tell you their names?¡±
¡°I know their names.¡±
¡°Do not be so certain.¡± The ruby at Melisandre¡¯s throat gleamed red. ¡°It is not the foes who
curse you to your face that you must fear, but those who smile when you are looking and sharpen their
knives when you turn your back. You would do well to keep your wolf close beside you. Ice, I see, and
daggers in the dark. Blood frozen red and hard, and naked steel. It was very cold.¡±
¡°It is always cold on the Wall.¡±
¡°You think so?¡±
¡°I know so, my lady.¡±
¡°Then you know nothing, Jon Snow,¡± she whispered.
BRAN
Are we there yet?
Bran never said the words aloud, but they were often on his lips as their ragged company
trudged through groves of ancient oaks and towering grey-green sentinels, past gloomy soldier pines
and bare brown chestnut trees. Are we near? the boy would wonder, as Hodor clambered up a stony
slope, or descended into some dark crevice where drifts of dirty snow cracked beneath his feet. How
much farther? he would think, as the great elk splashed across a half-frozen stream. How much longer?
It¡¯s so cold. Where is the three-eyed crow?
Swaying in his wicker basket on Hodor¡¯s back, the boy hunched down, ducking his head as the
big stableboy passed beneath the limb of an oak. The snow was falling again, wet and heavy. Hodor
walked with one eye frozen shut, his thick brown beard a tangle of hoarfrost, icicles drooping from the
ends of his bushy mustache. One gloved hand still clutched the rusty iron longsword he had taken from
the crypts below Winterfell, and from time to time he would lash out at a branch, knocking loose a spray
of snow. ¡°Hod-d-d-dor,¡± he would mutter, his teeth chattering.
The sound was strangely reassuring. On their journey from Winterfell to the Wall, Bran and his
companions had made the miles shorter by talking and telling tales, but it was different here. Even
Hodor felt it. His hodors came less often than they had south of the Wall. There was a stillness to this
wood like nothing Bran had ever known before. Before the snows began, the north wind would swirl
around them and clouds of dead brown leaves would kick up from the ground with a faint small rustling
sound that reminded him of roaches scurrying in a cupboard, but now all the leaves were buried under a
blanket of white. From time to time a raven would fly overhead, big black wings slapping against the
cold air. Elsewise the world was silent.
Just ahead, the elk wove between the snowdrifts with his head down, his huge rack of antlers
crusted with ice. The ranger sat astride his broad back, grim and silent. Coldhands was the name that the
fat boy Sam had given him, for though the ranger¡¯s face was pale, his hands were black and hard as iron,
and cold as iron too. The rest of him was wrapped in layers of wool and boiled leather and ringmail, his
features shadowed by his hooded cloak and a black woolen scarf about the lower half of his face.
Behind the ranger, Meera Reed wrapped her arms around her brother, to shelter him from the
wind and cold with the warmth of her own body. A crust of frozen snot had formed below Jojen¡¯s nose,
and from time to time he shivered violently. He looks so small, Bran thought, as he watched him sway.
He looks smaller than me now, and weaker too, and I¡¯m the cripple.
Summer brought up the rear of their little band. The direwolf¡¯s breath frosted the forest air as
he padded after them, still limping on the hind leg that had taken the arrow back at Queenscrown. Bran
felt the pain of the old wound whenever he slipped inside the big wolf¡¯s skin. Of late Bran wore
Summer¡¯s body more often than his own; the wolf felt the bite of the cold, despite the thickness of his
fur, but he could see farther and hear better and smell more than the boy in the basket, bundled up like
a babe in swaddling clothes.
Other times, when he was tired of being a wolf, Bran slipped into Hodor¡¯s skin instead. The
gentle giant would whimper when he felt him, and thrash his shaggy head from side to side, but not as
violently as he had the first time, back at Queenscrown. He knows it¡¯s me, the boy liked to tell himself.
He¡¯s used to me by now. Even so, he never felt comfortable inside Hodor¡¯s skin. The big stableboy never
understood what was happening, and Bran could taste the fear at the back of his mouth. It was better
inside Summer. I am him, and he is me. He feels what I feel.
Sometimes Bran could sense the direwolf sniffing after the elk, wondering if he could bring the
great beast down. Summer had grown accustomed to horses at Winterfell, but this was an elk and elk
were prey. The direwolf could sense the warm blood coursing beneath the elk¡¯s shaggy hide. Just the
smell was enough to make the slaver run from between his jaws, and when it did Bran¡¯s mouth would
water at the thought of rich, dark meat.
From a nearby oak a raven quorked, and Bran heard the sound of wings as another of the big
black birds flapped down to land beside it. By day only half a dozen ravens stayed with them, flitting
from tree to tree or riding on the antlers of the elk. The rest of the murder flew ahead or lingered
behind. But when the sun sank low they would return, descending from the sky on night-black wings
until every branch of every tree was thick with them for yards around. Some would fly to the ranger and
mutter at him, and it seemed to Bran that he understood their quorks and squawks. They are his eyes
and ears. They scout for him, and whisper to him of dangers ahead and behind.
As now. The elk stopped suddenly, and the ranger vaulted lightly from his back to land in
knee-deep snow. Summer growled at him, his fur bristling. The direwolf did not like the way that
Coldhands smelled. Dead meat, dry blood, a faint whiff of rot. And cold. Cold over all.
¡°What is it?¡± Meera wanted to know.
¡°Behind us,¡± Coldhands announced, his voice muffled by the black wool scarf across his nose
and mouth.
¡°Wolves?¡± Bran asked. They had known for days that they were being followed. Every night they
heard the mournful howling of the pack, and every night the wolves seemed a little closer. Hunters, and
hungry. They can smell how weak we are. Often Bran woke shivering hours before the dawn, listening to
the sound of them calling to one another in the distance as he waited for the sun to rise. If there are
wolves, there must be prey, he used to think, until it came to him that they were the prey.
The ranger shook his head. ¡°Men. The wolves still keep their distance. These men are not so
shy.¡±
Meera Reed pushed back her hood. The wet snow that had covered it tumbled to the ground
with a soft thump. ¡°How many men? Who are they?¡±
¡°Foes. I¡¯ll deal with them.¡±
¡°I¡¯ll come with you.¡±
¡°You¡¯ll stay. The boy must be protected. There is a lake ahead, hard frozen. When you come on
it, turn north and follow the shoreline. You¡¯ll come to a fishing village. Take refuge there until I can catch
up with you.¡±
Bran thought that Meera meant to argue until her brother said, ¡°Do as he says. He knows this
land.¡± Jojen¡¯s eyes were a dark green, the color of moss, but heavy with a weariness that Bran had never
seen in them before. The little grandfather. South of the Wall, the boy from the crannogs had seemed to
be wise beyond his years, but up here he was as lost and frightened as the rest of them. Even so, Meera
always listened to him.
That was still true. Coldhands slipped between the trees, back the way they¡¯d come, with four
ravens flapping after him. Meera watched him go, her cheeks red with cold, breath puffing from her
nostrils. She pulled her hood back up and gave the elk a nudge, and their trek resumed. Before they had
gone twenty yards, though, she turned to glance behind them and said, ¡°Men, he says. What men? Does
he mean wildlings? Why won¡¯t he say?¡±
¡°He said he¡¯d go and deal with them,¡± said Bran.
¡°He said, aye. He said he would take us to this three-eyed crow too. That river we crossed this
morning is the same one we crossed four days ago, I swear. We¡¯re going in circles.¡±
¡°Rivers turn and twist,¡± Bran said uncertainly, ¡°and where there¡¯s lakes and hills, you need to go
around.¡±
¡°There¡¯s been too much going around,¡± Meera insisted, ¡°and too many secrets. I don¡¯t like it. I
don¡¯t like him. And I don¡¯t trust him. Those hands of his are bad enough. He hides his face, and will not
speak a name. Who is he? What is he? Anyone can put on a black cloak. Anyone, or any thing. He does
not eat, he never drinks, he does not seem to feel the cold.¡±
It¡¯s true. Bran had been afraid to speak of it, but he had noticed. Whenever they took shelter for
the night, while he and Hodor and the Reeds huddled together for warmth, the ranger kept apart.
Sometimes Cold-hands closed his eyes, but Bran did not think he slept. And there was something else ¡­
¡°The scarf.¡± Bran glanced about uneasily, but there was not a raven to be seen. All the big black
birds had left them when the ranger did. No one was listening. Even so, he kept his voice low. ¡°The scarf
over his mouth, it never gets all hard with ice, like Hodor¡¯s beard. Not even when he talks.¡±
Meera gave him a sharp look. ¡°You¡¯re right. We¡¯ve never seen his breath, have we?¡±
¡°No.¡± A puff of white heralded each of Hodor¡¯s hodors. When Jojen or his sister spoke, their
words could be seen too. Even the elk left a warm fog upon the air when he exhaled.
¡°If he does not breathe ¡­¡±
Bran found himself remembering the tales Old Nan had told him when he was a babe. Beyond
the Wall the monsters live, the giants and the ghouls, the stalking shadows and the dead that walk, she
would say, tucking him in beneath his scratchy woolen blanket, but they cannot pass so long as the Wall
stands strong and the men of the Night¡¯s Watch are true. So go to sleep, my little Brandon, my baby boy,
and dream sweet dreams. There are no monsters here. The ranger wore the black of the Night¡¯s Watch,
but what if he was not a man at all? What if he was some monster, taking them to the other monsters to
be devoured?
¡°The ranger saved Sam and the girl from the wights,¡± Bran said, hesitantly, ¡°and he¡¯s taking me
to the three-eyed crow.¡±
¡°Why won¡¯t this three-eyed crow come to us? Why couldn¡¯t he meet us at the Wall? Crows have
wings. My brother grows weaker every day. How long can we go on?¡±
Jojen coughed. ¡°Until we get there.¡±
They came upon the promised lake not long after, and turned north as the ranger had bid them.
That was the easy part.
The water was frozen, and the snow had been falling for so long that Bran had lost count of the
days, turning the lake into a vast white wilderness. Where the ice was flat and the ground was bumpy,
the going was easy, but where the wind had pushed the snow up into ridges, sometimes it was hard to
tell where the lake ended and the shore began. Even the trees were not as infallible a guide as they
might have hoped, for there were wooded islands in the lake, and wide areas ashore where no trees
grew.
The elk went where he would, regardless of the wishes of Meera and Jojen on his back. Mostly
he stayed beneath the trees, but where the shore curved away westward he would take the more direct
path across the frozen lake, shouldering through snowdrifts taller than Bran as the ice crackled
underneath his hooves. Out there the wind was stronger, a cold north wind that howled across the lake,
knifed through their layers of wool and leather, and set them all to shivering. When it blew into their
faces, it would drive the snow into their eyes and leave them as good as blind.
Hours passed in silence. Ahead, shadows began to steal between the trees, the long fingers of
the dusk. Dark came early this far north. Bran had come to dread that. Each day seemed shorter than
the last, and where the days were cold, the nights were bitter cruel.
Meera halted them again. ¡°We should have come on the village by now.¡± Her voice sounded
hushed and strange.
¡°Could we have passed it?¡± Bran asked. ¡°I hope not. We need to find shelter before nightfall.¡±
She was not wrong. Jojen¡¯s lips were blue, Meera¡¯s cheeks dark red. Bran¡¯s own face had gone
numb. Hodor¡¯s beard was solid ice. Snow caked his legs almost to the knee, and Bran had felt him
stagger more than once. No one was as strong as Hodor, no one. If even his great strength was failing ¡­
¡°Summer can find the village,¡± Bran said suddenly, his words misting in the air. He did not wait
to hear what Meera might say, but closed his eyes and let himself flow from his broken body.
As he slipped inside Summer¡¯s skin, the dead woods came to sudden life. Where before there
had been silence, now he heard: wind in the trees, Hodor¡¯s breathing, the elk pawing at the ground in
search of fodder. Familiar scents filled his nostrils: wet leaves and dead grass, the rotted carcass of a
squirrel decaying in the brush, the sour stink of man-sweat, the musky odor of the elk. Food. Meat. The
elk sensed his interest. He turned his head toward the direwolf, wary, and lowered his great antlers.
He is not prey, the boy whispered to the beast who shared his skin. Leave him. Run.
Summer ran. Across the lake he raced, his paws kicking up sprays of snow behind him. The trees
stood shoulder to shoulder, like men in a battle line, all cloaked in white. Over roots and rocks the
direwolf sped, through a drift of old snow, the crust crackling beneath his weight. His paws grew wet
and cold. The next hill was covered with pines, and the sharp scent of their needles filled the air. When
he reached the top, he turned in a circle, sniffing at the air, then raised his head and howled.
The smells were there. Mansmells.
Ashes, Bran thought, old and faint, but ashes. It was the smell of burnt wood, soot, and charcoal.
A dead fire.
He shook the snow off his muzzle. The wind was gusting, so the smells were hard to follow. The
wolf turned this way and that, sniffing. All around were heaps of snow and tall trees garbed in white.
The wolf let his tongue loll out between his teeth, tasting the frigid air, his breath misting as snow-flakes
melted on his tongue. When he trotted toward the scent, Hodor lumbered after him at once. The elk
took longer to decide, so Bran returned reluctantly to his own body and said, ¡°That way. Follow
Summer. I smelled it.¡±
As the first sliver of a crescent moon came peeking through the clouds, they finally stumbled
into the village by the lake. They had almost walked straight through it. From the ice, the village looked
no different than a dozen other spots along the lakeshore. Buried under drifts of snow, the round stone
houses could just as easily have been boulders or hillocks or fallen logs, like the deadfall that Jojen had
mistaken for a building the day before, until they dug down into it and found only broken branches and
rotting logs.
The village was empty, abandoned by the wildlings who had once lived there, like all the other
villages they had passed. Some had been burned, as if the inhabitants had wanted to make certain they
could not come creeping back, but this one had been spared the torch. Beneath the snow they found a
dozen huts and a longhall, with its sod roof and thick walls of rough-hewn logs.
¡°At least we will be out of the wind,¡± Bran said.
¡°Hodor,¡± said Hodor.
Meera slid down from the elk¡¯s back. She and her brother helped lift Bran out of the wicker
basket. ¡°Might be the wildlings left some food behind,¡± she said.
That proved a forlorn hope. Inside the longhall they found the ashes of a fire, floors of
hard-packed dirt, a chill that went bone deep. But at least they had a roof above their heads and log
walls to keep the wind off. A stream ran nearby, covered with a film of ice. The elk had to crack it with
his hoof to drink. Once Bran and Jojen and Hodor were safely settled, Meera fetched back some chunks
of broken ice for them to suck on. The melting water was so cold it made Bran shudder.
Summer did not follow them into the longhall. Bran could feel the big wolf¡¯s hunger, a shadow
of his own. ¡°Go hunt,¡± he told him, ¡°but you leave the elk alone.¡± Part of him was wishing he could go
hunting too. Perhaps he would, later.
Supper was a fistful of acorns, crushed and pounded into paste, so bitter that Bran gagged as he
tried to keep it down. Jojen Reed did not even make the attempt. Younger and frailer than his sister, he
was growing weaker by the day.
¡°Jojen, you have to eat,¡± Meera told him. ¡°Later. I just want to rest.¡± Jojen smiled a wan smile.
¡°This is not the day I die, sister. I promise you.¡±
¡°You almost fell off the elk.¡±
¡°Almost. I am cold and hungry, that¡¯s all.¡±
¡°Then eat.¡±
¡°Crushed acorns? My belly hurts, but that will only make it worse. Leave me be, sister. I¡¯m
dreaming of roast chicken.¡±
¡°Dreams will not sustain you. Not even greendreams.¡±
¡°Dreams are what we have.¡±
All we have. The last of the food that they had brought from the south was ten days gone. Since
then hunger walked beside them day and night. Even Summer could find no game in these woods. They
lived on crushed acorns and raw fish. The woods were full of frozen streams and cold black lakes, and
Meera was as good a fisher with her three-pronged frog spear as most men were with hook and line.
Some days her lips were blue with cold by the time she waded back to them with her catch wriggling on
her tines. It had been three days since Meera caught a fish, however. Bran¡¯s belly felt so hollow it might
have been three years.
After they choked down their meagre supper, Meera sat with her back against a wall,
sharpening her dagger on a whetstone. Hodor squatted down beside the door, rocking back and forth
on his haunches and muttering, ¡°Hodor, hodor, hodor.¡±
Bran closed his eyes. It was too cold to talk, and they dare not light a fire. Coldhands had warned
them against that. These woods are not as empty as you think, he had said. You cannot know what the
light might summon from the darkness. The memory made him shiver, despite the warmth of Hodor
beside him.
Sleep would not come, could not come. Instead there was wind, the biting cold, moonlight on
snow, and fire. He was back inside Summer, long leagues away, and the night was rank with the smell of
blood. The scent was strong. A kill, not far. The flesh would still be warm. Slaver ran between his teeth
as the hunger woke inside him. Not elk. Not deer. Not this.
The direwolf moved toward the meat, a gaunt grey shadow sliding from tree to tree, through
pools of moonlight and over mounds of snow. The wind gusted around him, shifting. He lost the scent,
found it, then lost it again. As he searched for it once more, a distant sound made his ears prick up.
Wolf, he knew at once. Summer stalked toward the sound, wary now. Soon enough the scent of
blood was back, but now there were other smells: piss and dead skins, bird shit, feathers, and wolf, wolf,
wolf. A pack. He would need to fight for his meat.
They smelled him too. As he moved out from amongst the darkness of the trees into the bloody
glade, they were watching him. The female was chewing on a leather boot that still had half a leg in it,
but she let it fall at his approach. The leader of the pack, an old male with a grizzled white muzzle and a
blind eye, moved out to meet him, snarling, his teeth bared. Behind him, a younger male showed his
fangs as well.
The direwolf¡¯s pale yellow eyes drank in the sights around them. A nest of entrails coiled
through a bush, entangled with the branches. Steam rising from an open belly, rich with the smells of
blood and meat. A head staring sightlessly up at a horned moon, cheeks ripped and torn down to bloody
bone, pits for eyes, neck ending in a ragged stump. A pool of frozen blood, glistening red and black.
Men. The stink of them filled the world. Alive, they had been as many as the fingers on a man¡¯s
paw, but now they were none. Dead. Done. Meat. Cloaked and hooded, once, but the wolves had torn
their clothing into pieces in their frenzy to get at the flesh. Those who still had faces wore thick beards
crusted with ice and frozen snot. The falling snow had begun to bury what remained of them, so pale
against the black of ragged cloaks and breeches. Black.
Long leagues away, the boy stirred uneasily.
Black. Night¡¯s Watch. They were Night¡¯s Watch.
The direwolf did not care. They were meat. He was hungry.
The eyes of the three wolves glowed yellow. The direwolf swung his head from side to side,
nostrils flaring, then bared his fangs in a snarl. The younger male backed away. The direwolf could smell
the fear in him. Tail, he knew. But the one-eyed wolf answered with a growl and moved to block his
advance. Head. And he does not fear me though I am twice his size.
Their eyes met.
Warg!
Then the two rushed together, wolf and direwolf, and there was no more time for thought. The
world shrank down to tooth and claw, snow flying as they rolled and spun and tore at one another, the
other wolves snarling and snapping around them. His jaws closed on matted fur slick with hoarfrost, on
a limb thin as a dry stick, but the one-eyed wolf clawed at his belly and tore himself free, rolled, lunged
for him. Yellow fangs snapped closed on his throat, but he shook off his old grey cousin as he would a
rat, then charged after him, knocked him down. Rolling, ripping, kicking, they fought until the both of
them were ragged and fresh blood dappled the snows around them. But finally the old one-eyed wolf
lay down and showed his belly. The direwolf snapped at him twice more, sniffed at his butt, then lifted a
leg over him.
A few snaps and a warning growl, and the female and the tail submitted too. The pack was his.
The prey as well. He went from man to man, sniffing, before settling on the biggest, a faceless
thing who clutched black iron in one hand. His other hand was missing, severed at the wrist, the stump
bound up in leather. Blood flowed thick and sluggish from the slash across his throat. The wolf lapped at
it with his tongue, licked the ragged eyeless ruin of his nose and cheeks, then buried his muzzle in his
neck and tore it open, gulping down a gobbet of sweet meat. No flesh had ever tasted half as good.
When he was done with that one, he moved to the next, and devoured the choicest bits of that
man too. Ravens watched him from the trees, squatting dark-eyed and silent on the branches as snow
drifted down around them. The other wolves made do with his leavings; the old male fed first, then the
female, then the tail. They were his now. They were pack.
No, the boy whispered, we have another pack. Lady¡¯s dead and maybe Grey Wind too, but
somewhere there¡¯s still Shaggydog and Nymeria and Ghost. Remember Ghost?
Falling snow and feasting wolves began to dim. Warmth beat against his face, comforting as a
mother¡¯s kisses. Fire, he thought, smoke. His nose twitched to the smell of roasting meat. And then the
forest fell away, and he was back in the longhall again, back in his broken body, staring at a fire. Meera
Reed was turning a chunk of raw red flesh above the flames, letting it char and spit. ¡°Just in time,¡± she
said. Bran rubbed his eyes with the heel of his hand and wriggled backwards against the wall to sit. ¡°You
almost slept through supper. The ranger found a sow.¡±
Behind her, Hodor was tearing eagerly at a chunk of hot charred flesh as blood and grease ran
down into his beard. Wisps of smoke rose from between his fingers. ¡°Hodor,¡± he muttered between
bites, ¡°hodor, hodor.¡± His sword lay on the earthen floor beside him. Jojen Reed nipped at his own joint
with small bites, chewing each chunk of meat a dozen times before swallowing.
The ranger killed a pig. Coldhands stood beside the door, a raven on his arm, both staring at the
fire. Reflections from the flames glittered off four black eyes. He does not eat, Bran remembered, and he
fears the flames.
¡°You said no fire,¡± he reminded the ranger. ¡°The walls around us hide the light, and dawn is
close. We will be on our way soon.¡±
¡°What happened to the men? The foes behind us?¡±
¡°They will not trouble you.¡±
¡°Who were they? Wildlings?¡±
Meera turned the meat to cook the other side. Hodor was chewing and swallowing, muttering
happily under his breath. Only Jojen seemed aware of what was happening as Coldhands turned his
head to stare at Bran. ¡°They were foes.¡±
Men of the Night¡¯s Watch. ¡°You killed them. You and the ravens. Their faces were all torn, and
their eyes were gone.¡± Coldhands did not deny it. ¡°They were your brothers. I saw. The wolves had
ripped their clothes up, but I could still tell. Their cloaks were black. Like your hands.¡± Cold-hands said
nothing. ¡°Who are you? Why are your hands black?¡±
The ranger studied his hands as if he had never noticed them before. ¡°Once the heart has
ceased to beat, a man¡¯s blood runs down into his extremities, where it thickens and congeals.¡± His voice
rattled in his throat, as thin and gaunt as he was. ¡°His hands and feet swell up and turn as black as
pudding. The rest of him becomes as white as milk.¡±
Meera Reed rose, her frog spear in her hand, a chunk of smoking meat still impaled upon its
tines. ¡°Show us your face.¡±
The ranger made no move to obey.
¡°He¡¯s dead.¡± Bran could taste the bile in his throat. ¡°Meera, he¡¯s some dead thing. The monsters
cannot pass so long as the Wall stands and the men of the Night¡¯s Watch stay true, that¡¯s what Old Nan
used to say. He came to meet us at the Wall, but he could not pass. He sent Sam instead, with that
wildling girl.¡±
Meera¡¯s gloved hand tightened around the shaft of her frog spear. ¡°Who sent you? Who is this
three-eyed crow?¡±
¡°A friend. Dreamer, wizard, call him what you will. The last green-seer.¡± The longhall¡¯s wooden
door banged open. Outside, the night wind howled, bleak and black. The trees were full of ravens,
screaming. Cold-hands did not move.
¡°A monster,¡± Bran said.
The ranger looked at Bran as if the rest of them did not exist. ¡°Your monster, Brandon Stark.¡±
¡°Yours,¡± the raven echoed, from his shoulder. Outside the door, the ravens in the trees took up
the cry, until the night wood echoed to the murderer¡¯s song of ¡°Yours, yours, yours.¡±
¡°Jojen, did you dream this?¡± Meera asked her brother. ¡°Who is he? What is he? What do we do
now?¡±
¡°We go with the ranger,¡± said Jojen. ¡°We have come too far to turn back now, Meera. We would
never make it back to the Wall alive. We go with Bran¡¯s monster, or we die.¡±
TYRION
They departed Pentos by the Sunrise Gate, though Tyrion Lannister never glimpsed the sunrise.
¡°It will be as if you had never come to Pentos, my little friend,¡± promised Magister Illyrio, as he drew
shut the litter¡¯s purple velvet drapes. ¡°No man must see you leave the city, as no man saw you enter.¡±
¡°No man except the sailors who stuffed me in that barrel, the cabin boy who cleaned up after
me, the girl you sent to warm my bed, and that treacherous freckled washerwoman. Oh, and your
guards. Unless you removed their wits along with their balls, they know you¡¯re not alone in here.¡± The
litter was suspended between eight mammoth draft horses on heavy leather straps. Four eunuchs paced
beside the horses, two to either side, and more were trudging along behind to guard the baggage train.
¡°Unsullied tell no tales,¡± Illyrio assured him. ¡°And the galley that delivered you is on her way to
Asshai even now. It will be two years before she returns, if the seas are kind. As for my household, they
love me well. None would betray me.¡±
Cherish that thought, my fat friend. One day we will carve those words upon your crypt. ¡°We
should be aboard that galley,¡± the dwarf said. ¡°The fastest way to Volantis is by sea.¡±
¡°The sea is hazardous,¡± replied Illyrio. ¡°Autumn is a season rife with storms, and pirates still
make their dens upon the Stepstones and venture forth to prey on honest men. It would never do for
my little friend to fall into such hands.¡±
¡°There are pirates on the Rhoyne as well.¡±
¡°River pirates.¡± The cheesemonger gave a yawn, covering his mouth with the back of his hand.
¡°Cockroach captains scurrying after crumbs.¡±
¡°One hears talk of stone men as well.¡±
¡°They are real enough, poor damned things. But why speak of such things? The day is too fine
for such talk. We shall see the Rhoyne soon, and there you shall be rid of Illyrio and his big belly. Till
then, let us drink and dream. We have sweet wine and savories to enjoy. Why dwell upon disease and
death?¡±
Why indeed? Tyrion heard the thrum of a crossbow once again, and wondered. The litter
swayed side to side, a soothing movement that made him feel as if he were a child being rocked to sleep
in his mother¡¯s arms. Not that I would know what that was like. Silk pillows stuffed with goose down
cushioned his cheeks. The purple velvet walls curved overhead to form a roof, making it pleasantly
warm within despite the autumn chill outside.
A train of mules trailed behind them, carrying chests and casks and barrels, and hampers of
delectables to keep the lord of cheese from growing peckish. They nibbled on spiced sausage that
morning, washed down with a dark smokeberry brown. Jellied eels and Dornish reds filled their
afternoon. Come evening there were sliced hams, boiled eggs, and roasted larks stuffed with garlic and
onions, with pale ales and Myrish fire wines to help in their digestion. The litter was as slow as it was
comfortable, however, and the dwarf soon found himself itching with impatience.
¡°How many days until we reach the river?¡± he asked Illyrio that evening. ¡°At this pace, your
queen¡¯s dragons will be larger than Aegon¡¯s three before I can lay eyes upon them.¡±
¡°Would it were so. A large dragon is more fearsome than a small one.¡± The magister shrugged.
¡°Much as it would please me to welcome Queen Daenerys to Volantis, I must rely on you and Griff for
that. I can serve her best in Pentos, smoothing the way for her return. So long as I am with you, though
¡­ well, an old fat man must have his comforts, yes? Come, drink a cup of wine.¡±
¡°Tell me,¡± Tyrion said as he drank, ¡°why should a magister of Pentos give three figs who wears
the crown in Westeros? Where is the gain for you in this venture, my lord?¡±
The fat man dabbed grease from his lips. ¡°I am an old man, grown weary of this world and its
treacheries. Is it so strange that I should wish to do some good before my days are done, to help a sweet
young girl regain her birthright?¡±
Next you will be offering me a suit of magic armor and a palace in Valyria. ¡°If Daenerys is no
more than a sweet young girl, the Iron Throne will cut her into sweet young pieces.¡±
¡°Fear not, my little friend. The blood of Aegon the Dragon flows in her veins.¡±
Along with the blood of Aegon the Unworthy, Maegor the Cruel, and Baelor the Befuddled. ¡°Tell
me more of her.¡±
The fat man grew pensive. ¡°Daenerys was half a child when she came to me, yet fairer even
than my second wife, so lovely I was tempted to claim her for myself. Such a fearful, furtive thing,
however, I knew I should get no joy from coupling with her. Instead I summoned a bed-warmer and
fucked her vigorously until the madness passed. If truth be told, I did not think Daenerys would survive
for long amongst the horselords.¡±
¡°That did not stop you selling her to Khal Drogo ¡­¡±
¡°Dothraki neither buy nor sell. Say rather that her brother Viserys gave her to Drogo to win the
khal¡¯s friendship. A vain young man, and greedy. Viserys lusted for his father¡¯s throne, but he lusted for
Daenerys too, and was loath to give her up. The night before the princess wed he tried to steal into her
bed, insisting that if he could not have her hand, he would claim her maidenhead. Had I not taken the
precaution of posting guards upon her door, Viserys might have undone years of planning.¡±
¡°He sounds an utter fool.¡±
¡°Viserys was Mad Aerys¡¯s son, just so. Daenerys ¡­ Daenerys is quite different.¡± He popped a
roasted lark into his mouth and crunched it noisily, bones and all. ¡°The frightened child who sheltered in
my manse died on the Dothraki sea, and was reborn in blood and fire. This dragon queen who wears her
name is a true Targaryen. When I sent ships to bring her home, she turned toward Slaver¡¯s Bay. In a
short span of days she conquered Astapor, made Yunkai bend the knee, and sacked Meereen. Mantarys
will be next, if she marches west along the old Valyrian roads. If she comes by sea, well ¡­ her fleet must
take on food and water at Volantis.¡±
¡°By land or by sea, there are long leagues between Meereen and Volantis,¡± Tyrion observed.
¡°Five hundred fifty, as the dragon flies, through deserts, mountains, swamps, and
demon-haunted ruins. Many and more will perish, but those who survive will be stronger by the time
they reach Volantis ¡­ where they shall find you and Griff awaiting them, with fresh forces and sufficient
ships to carry them all across the sea to Westeros.¡±
Tyrion pondered all he knew of Volantis, oldest and proudest of the Nine Free Cities. Something
was awry here. Even with half a nose, he could smell it. ¡°It¡¯s said there are five slaves for every free man
in Volantis. Why would the triarchs assist a queen who smashed the slave trade?¡± He pointed at Illyrio.
¡°For that matter, why would you? Slavery may be forbidden by the laws of Pentos, yet you have a finger
in that trade as well, and maybe a whole hand. And yet you conspire for the dragon queen, and not
against her. Why? What do you hope to gain from Queen Daenerys?¡±
¡°Are we back to that again? You are a persistent little man.¡± Illyrio gave a laugh and slapped his
belly. ¡°As you will. The Beggar King swore that I should be his master of coin, and a lordly lord as well.
Once he wore his golden crown, I should have my choice of castles ¡­ even Casterly Rock, if I desired.¡±
Tyrion snorted wine back up the scarred stump that had been his nose. ¡°My father would have
loved to hear that.¡±
¡°Your lord father had no cause for concern. Why would I want a rock? My manse is large enough
for any man, and more comfortable than your drafty Westerosi castles. Master of coin, though ¡­¡± The
fat man peeled another egg. ¡°I am fond of coins. Is there any sound as sweet as the clink of gold on
gold?¡±
A sister¡¯s screams. ¡°Are you quite certain that Daenerys will make good her brother¡¯s
promises?¡±
¡°She will, or she will not.¡± Illyrio bit the egg in half. ¡°I told you, my little friend, not all that a man
does is done for gain. Believe as you wish, but even fat old fools like me have friends, and debts of
affection to repay.¡±
Liar, thought Tyrion. There is something in this venture worth more to you than coin or castles.
¡°You meet so few men who value friendship over gold these days.¡±
¡°Too true,¡± the fat man said, deaf to the irony. ¡°How is it that the Spider became so dear to
you?¡±
¡°We were young together, two green boys in Pentos.¡±
¡°Varys came from Myr.¡±
¡°So he did. I met him not long after he arrived, one step ahead of the slavers. By day he slept in
the sewers, by night he prowled the rooftops like a cat. I was near as poor, a bravo in soiled silks, living
by my blade. Perhaps you chanced to glimpse the statue by my pool? Pytho Malanon carved that when I
was six-and-ten. A lovely thing, though now I weep to see it.¡±
¡°Age makes ruins of us all. I am still in mourning for my nose. But Varys ¡­¡±
¡°In Myr he was a prince of thieves, until a rival thief informed on him. In Pentos his accent
marked him, and once he was known for a eunuch he was despised and beaten. Why he chose me to
protect him I may never know, but we came to an arrangement. Varys spied on lesser thieves and took
their takings. I offered my help to their victims, promising to recover their valuables for a fee. Soon
every man who had suffered a loss knew to come to me, whilst city¡¯s footpads and cutpurses sought out
Varys ¡­ half to slit his throat, the other half to sell him what they¡¯d stolen. We both grew rich, and richer
still when Varys trained his mice.¡±
¡°In King¡¯s Landing he kept little birds.¡±
¡°Mice, we called them then. The older thieves were fools who thought no further than turning a
night¡¯s plunder into wine. Varys preferred orphan boys and young girls. He chose the smallest, the ones
who were quick and quiet, and taught them to climb walls and slip down chimneys. He taught them to
read as well. We left the gold and gems for common thieves. Instead our mice stole letters, ledgers,
charts ¡­ later, they would read them and leave them where they lay. Secrets are worth more than silver
or sapphires, Varys claimed. Just so. I grew so respectable that a cousin of the Prince of Pentos let me
wed his maiden daughter, whilst whispers of a certain eunuch¡¯s talents crossed the narrow sea and
reached the ears of a certain king. A very anxious king, who did not wholly trust his son, nor his wife, nor
his Hand, a friend of his youth who had grown arrogant and overproud. I do believe that you know the
rest of this tale, is that not so?¡±
¡°Much of it,¡± Tyrion admitted. ¡°I see that you are somewhat more than a cheesemonger after
all.¡±
Illyrio inclined his head. ¡°You are kind to say so, my little friend. And for my part, I see that you
are just as quick as Lord Varys claimed.¡± He smiled, showing all his crooked yellow teeth, and shouted
for another jar of Myrish fire wine.
When the magister drifted off to sleep with the wine jar at his elbow, Tyrion crept across the
pillows to work it loose from its fleshy prison and pour himself a cup. He drained it down, and yawned,
and filled it once again. If I drink enough fire wine, he told himself, perhaps I¡¯ll dream of dragons.
When he was still a lonely child in the depths of Casterly Rock, he oft rode dragons through the
nights, pretending he was some lost Targaryen princeling, or a Valyrian dragonlord soaring high o¡¯er
fields and mountains. Once, when his uncles asked him what gift he wanted for his name-day, he
begged them for a dragon. ¡°It wouldn¡¯t need to be a big one. It could be little, like I am.¡± His uncle
Gerion thought that was the funniest thing he had ever heard, but his uncle Tygett said, ¡°The last dragon
died a century ago, lad.¡± That had seemed so monstrously unfair that the boy had cried himself to sleep
that night.
Yet if the lord of cheese could be believed, the Mad King¡¯s daughter had hatched three living
dragons. Two more than even a Targaryen should require. Tyrion was almost sorry that he had killed his
father. He would have enjoyed seeing Lord Tywin¡¯s face when he learned that there was a Targaryen
queen on her way to Westeros with three dragons, backed by a scheming eunuch and a cheesemonger
half the size of Casterly Rock.
The dwarf was so stuffed that he had to undo his belt and the topmost laces on his breeches.
The boy¡¯s clothes his host had dressed him in made him feel like ten pounds of sausage in a five-pound
skin. If we eat this way every day I will be the size of Illyrio before I meet this dragon queen. Out-side the
litter night had fallen. Inside all was dark. Tyrion listened to Illyrio¡¯s snores, the creak of the leather
straps, the slow clop clop of the team¡¯s ironshod hooves on the hard Valyrian road, but his heart was
listening for the beat of leathern wings.
When he woke, dawn had come. The horses plodded on, the litter creaking and swaying
between them. Tyrion pulled the curtain back an inch to peer outside, but there was little to see but
ochre fields, bare brown elms, and the road itself, a broad stone highway that ran straight as a spear to
the horizon. He had read about Valyrian roads, but this was the first he had seen. The Freehold¡¯s grasp
had reached as far as Dragonstone, but never to the mainland of Westeros itself. Odd, that.
Dragonstone is no more than a rock. The wealth was farther west, but they had dragons. Surely they
knew that it was there.
He had drunk too much last night. His head was pounding, and even the gentle swaying of the
litter was enough to make his gorge rise in his throat. Though he said no word of complaint, his distress
must have been plain to Illyrio Mopatis. ¡°Come, drink with me,¡± the fat man said. ¡°A scale from the
dragon that burned you, as they say.¡± He poured for them from a flagon of blackberry wine so sweet
that it drew more flies than honey. Tyrion shooed them off with the back of his hand and drank deep.
The taste was so cloying that it was all he could do to keep it down. The second cup went down easier,
however. Even so, he had no appetite, and when Illyrio offered him a bowl of blackberries in cream he
waved it off. ¡°I dreamed about the queen,¡± he said. ¡°I was on my knees before her, swearing my
allegiance, but she mistook me for my brother, Jaime, and fed me to her dragons.¡±
¡°Let us hope this dream was not prophetic. You are a clever imp, just as Varys said, and
Daenerys will have need of clever men about her. Ser Barristan is a valiant knight and true; but none, I
think, has ever called him cunning.¡±
¡°Knights know only one way to solve a problem. They couch their lances and charge. A dwarf
has a different way of looking at the world. What of you, though? You are a clever man yourself.¡±
¡°You flatter me.¡± Illyrio waggled his hand. ¡°Alas, I am not made for travel, so I will send you to
Daenerys in my stead. You did Her Grace a great service when you slew your father, and it is my hope
that you will do her many more. Daenerys is not the fool her brother was. She will make good use of
you.¡±
As kindling? Tyrion thought, smiling pleasantly.
They changed out teams only thrice that day but seemed to halt twice an hour at the least so
Illyrio could climb down from the litter and have himself a piss. Our lord of cheese is the size of an
elephant, but he has a bladder like a peanut, the dwarf mused. During one stop, he used the time to
have a closer look at the road. Tyrion knew what he would find: not packed earth, nor bricks, nor
cobbles, but a ribbon of fused stone raised a half foot above the ground to allow rainfall and snowmelt
to run off its shoulders. Unlike the muddy tracks that passed for roads in the Seven Kingdoms, the
Valyrian roads were wide enough for three wagons to pass abreast, and neither time nor traffic marred
them. They still endured, unchanging, four centuries after Valyria itself had met its Doom. He looked for
ruts and cracks but found only a pile of warm dung deposited by one of the horses.
The dung made him think of his lord father. Are you down in some hell, Father? A nice cold hell
where you can look up and see me help restore Mad Aerys¡¯s daughter to the Iron Throne?
As they resumed their journey, Illyrio produced a bag of roasted chestnuts and began to speak
once more of the dragon queen. ¡°Our last news of Queen Daenerys is old and stale, I fear. By now she
will have left Meereen, we must assume. She has her host at last, a ragged host of sellswords, Dothraki
horselords, and Unsullied infantry, and she will no doubt lead them west, to take back her father¡¯s
throne.¡± Magister Illyrio twisted open a pot of garlic snails, sniffed at them, and smiled. ¡°At Volantis, you
will have fresh tidings of Daenerys, we must hope,¡± he said, as he sucked one from its shell. ¡°Dragons
and young girls are both capricious, and it may be that you will need to adjust your plans. Griff will know
what to do. Will you have a snail? The garlic is from my own gardens.¡±
I could ride a snail and make a better pace than this litter of yours. Tyrion waved the dish away.
¡°You place a deal of trust in this man Griff. Another friend of your childhood?¡±
¡°No. A sellsword, you would call him, but Westerosi born. Daenerys needs men worthy of her
cause.¡± Illyrio raised a hand. ¡°I know! ¡®Sellswords put gold before honor,¡¯ you are thinking. ¡®This man
Griff will sell me to my sister.¡¯ Not so. I trust Griff as I would trust a brother.¡±
Another mortal error. ¡°Then I shall do likewise.¡±
¡°The Golden Company marches toward Volantis as we speak, there to await the coming of our
queen out of the east.¡±
Beneath the gold, the bitter steel. ¡°I had heard the Golden Company was under contract with
one of the Free Cities.¡±
¡°Myr.¡± Illyrio smirked. ¡°Contracts can be broken.¡±
¡°There is more coin in cheese than I knew,¡± said Tyrion. ¡°How did you accomplish that?¡±
The magister waggled his fat fingers. ¡°Some contracts are writ in ink, and some in blood. I say no
more.¡±
The dwarf pondered that. The Golden Company was reputedly the finest of the free companies,
founded a century ago by Bittersteel, a bastard son of Aegon the Unworthy. When another of Aegon¡¯s
Great Bastards tried to seize the Iron Throne from his trueborn half-brother, Bittersteel joined the
revolt. Daemon Blackfyre had perished on the Redgrass Field, however, and his rebellion with him.
Those followers of the Black Dragon who survived the battle yet refused to bend the knee fled across
the narrow sea, among them Daemon¡¯s younger sons, Bittersteel, and hundreds of landless lords and
knights who soon found themselves forced to sell their swords to eat. Some joined the Ragged Standard,
some the Second Sons or Maiden¡¯s Men. Bittersteel saw the strength of House Blackfyre scattering to
the four winds, so he formed the Golden Company to bind the exiles together.
From that day to this, the men of the Golden Company had lived and died in the Disputed Lands,
fighting for Myr or Lys or Tyrosh in their pointless little wars, and dreaming of the land their fathers had
lost. They were exiles and sons of exiles, dispossessed and unforgiven ¡­ yet formidable fighters still.
¡°I admire your powers of persuasion,¡± Tyrion told Illyrio. ¡°How did you convince the Golden
Company to take up the cause of our sweet queen when they have spent so much of their history
fighting against the Targaryens?¡±
Illyrio brushed away the objection as if it were a fly. ¡°Black or red, a dragon is still a dragon.
When Maelys the Monstrous died upon the Stepstones, it was the end of the male line of House
Blackfyre.¡± The cheesemonger smiled through his forked beard. ¡°And Daenerys will give the exiles what
Bittersteel and the Blackfyres never could. She will take them home.¡±
With fire and sword. It was the kind of homecoming that Tyrion wished for as well. ¡°Ten
thousand swords makes for a princely gift, I grant you. Her Grace should be most pleased.¡±
The magister gave a modest bob of his head, chins jiggling. ¡°I would never presume to say what
might please Her Grace.¡±
Prudent of you. Tyrion knew much and more about the gratitude of kings. Why should queens
be any different?
Soon enough the magister was fast asleep, leaving Tyrion to brood alone. He wondered what
Barristan Selmy would think of riding into battle with the Golden Company. During the War of the
Ninepenny Kings, Selmy had cut a bloody path through their ranks to slay the last of the Blackfyre
Pretenders. Rebellion makes for queer bedfellows. And none more queer than this fat man and me.
The cheesemonger woke when they stopped to change the horses and sent for a fresh hamper.
¡°How far have we come?¡± the dwarf asked him as they stuffed themselves with cold capon and a relish
made of carrots, raisins, and bits of lime and orange.
¡°This is Andalos, my friend. The land your Andals came from. They took it from the hairy men
who were here before them, cousins to the hairy men of Ib. The heart of Hugor¡¯s ancient realm lies
north of us, but we are passing through its southern marches. In Pentos, these are called the Flatlands.
Farther east stand the Velvet Hills, whence we are bound.¡±
Andalos. The Faith taught that the Seven themselves had once walked the hills of Andalos in
human form. ¡°The Father reached his hand into the heavens and pulled down seven stars,¡± Tyrion
recited from memory, ¡°and one by one he set them on the brow of Hugor of the Hill to make a glowing
crown.¡±
Magister Illyrio gave him a curious look. ¡°I did not dream my little friend was so devout.¡±
The dwarf shrugged. ¡°A relic of my boyhood. I knew I would not make a knight, so I decided to
be High Septon. That crystal crown adds a foot to a man¡¯s height. I studied the holy books and prayed
until I had scabs on both my knees, but my quest came to a tragic end. I reached that certain age and fell
in love.¡±
¡°A maiden? I know the way of that.¡± Illyrio thrust his right hand up his left sleeve and drew out a
silver locket. Inside was a painted likeness of a woman with big blue eyes and pale golden hair streaked
by silver. ¡°Serra. I found her in a Lysene pillow house and brought her home to warm my bed, but in the
end I wed her. Me, whose first wife had been a cousin of the Prince of Pentos. The palace gates were
closed to me thereafter, but I did not care. The price was small enough, for Serra.¡±
¡°How did she die?¡± Tyrion knew that she was dead; no man spoke so fondly of a woman who
had abandoned him.
¡°A Braavosi trading galley called at Pentos on her way back from the Jade Sea. The Treasure
carried cloves and saffron, jet and jade, scarlet samite, green silk ¡­ and the grey death. We slew her
oarsmen as they came ashore and burned the ship at anchor, but the rats crept down the oars and
paddled to the quay on cold stone feet. The plague took two thousand before it ran its course.¡±
Magister Illyrio closed the locket. ¡°I keep her hands in my bedchamber. Her hands that were so soft ¡­¡±
Tyrion thought of Tysha. He glanced out at the fields where once the gods had walked. ¡°What
sort of gods make rats and plagues and dwarfs?¡± Another passage from The Seven-Pointed Star came
back to him. ¡°The Maid brought him forth a girl as supple as a willow with eyes like deep blue pools, and
Hugor declared that he would have her for his bride. So the Mother made her fertile, and the Crone
foretold that she would bear the king four-and-forty mighty sons. The Warrior gave strength to their
arms, whilst the Smith wrought for each a suit of iron plates.¡±
¡°Your Smith must have been Rhoynish,¡± Illyrio quipped. ¡°The Andals learned the art of working
iron from the Rhoynar who dwelt along the river. This is known.¡±
¡°Not by our septons.¡± Tyrion gestured at the fields. ¡°Who dwells in these Flatlands of yours?¡±
¡°Tillers and toilers, bound to the land. There are orchards, farms, mines ¡­ I own some such
myself, though I seldom visit them. Why should I spend my days out here, with the myriad delights of
Pentos close at hand?¡±
¡°Myriad delights.¡± And huge thick walls. Tyrion swirled his wine in his cup. ¡°We have seen no
towns since Pentos.¡±
¡°There are ruins.¡± Illyrio waved a chicken leg toward the curtains. ¡°The horselords come this
way, whenever some khal takes it into his head to gaze upon the sea. The Dothraki are not fond of
towns, you will know this even in Westeros.¡±
¡°Fall upon one of these khalasars and destroy it, and you may find that the Dothraki are not so
quick to cross the Rhoyne.¡±
¡°It is cheaper to buy off foes with food and gifts.¡±
If only I had thought to bring a nice cheese to the battle on the Blackwater, I might still have all
my nose. Lord Tywin had always held the Free Cities in contempt. They fight with coins instead of
swords, he used to say. Gold has its uses, but wars are won with iron. ¡°Give gold to a foe and he will just
come back for more, my father always said.¡±
¡°Is this the selfsame father that you murdered?¡± Illyrio tossed his chicken bone from the litter.
¡°Sellswords will not stand against Dothraki screamers. That was proved at Qohor.¡±
¡°Not even your brave Griff?¡± mocked Tyrion. ¡°Griff is different. He has a son he dotes on. Young
Griff, the boy is called. There never was a nobler lad.¡±
The wine, the food, the sun, the sway of the litter, the buzzing of the flies, all conspired to make
Tyrion sleepy. So he slept, woke, drank. Illyrio matched him cup for cup. And as the sky turned a dusky
purple, the fat man began to snore.
That night Tyrion Lannister dreamed of a battle that turned the hills of Westeros as red as blood.
He was in the midst of it, dealing death with an axe as big as he was, fighting side by side with Barristan
the Bold and Bittersteel as dragons wheeled across the sky above them. In the dream he had two heads,
both noseless. His father led the enemy, so he slew him once again. Then he killed his brother, Jaime,
hacking at his face until it was a red ruin, laughing every time he struck a blow. Only when the fight was
finished did he realize that his second head was weeping.
When he woke his stunted legs were stiff as iron. Illyrio was eating olives. ¡°Where are we?¡±
Tyrion asked him.
¡°We have not yet left the Flatlands, my hasty friend. Soon our road shall pass into the Velvet
Hills. There we begin our climb toward Ghoyan Drohe, upon the Little Rhoyne.¡±
Ghoyan Drohe had been a Rhoynar city, until the dragons of Valyria had reduced it to a
smoldering desolation. I am traveling through years as well as leagues, Tyrion reflected, back through
history to the days when dragons ruled the earth.
Tyrion slept and woke and slept again, and day and night seemed not to matter. The Velvet Hills
proved a disappointment. ¡°Half the whores in Lannisport have breasts bigger than these hills,¡± he told
Illyrio. ¡°You ought to call them the Velvet Teats.¡± They saw a circle of standing stones that Illyrio claimed
had been raised by giants, and later a deep lake. ¡°Here lived a den of robbers who preyed on all who
passed this way,¡± Illyrio said. ¡°It is said they still dwell beneath the water. Those who fish the lake are
pulled under and devoured.¡± The next evening they came upon a huge Valyrian sphinx crouched beside
the road. It had a dragon¡¯s body and a woman¡¯s face.
¡°A dragon queen,¡± said Tyrion. ¡°A pleasant omen.¡±
¡°Her king is missing.¡± Illyrio pointed out the smooth stone plinth on which the second sphinx
once stood, now grown over with moss and flowering vines. ¡°The horselords built wooden wheels
beneath him and dragged him back to Vaes Dothrak.¡±
That is an omen too, thought Tyrion, but not as hopeful. That night, drunker than usual, he
broke into sudden song.
He rode through the streets of the city, down from his hill on high,
O¡¯er the wynds and the steps and the cobbles, he rode to a woman¡¯s sigh.
For she was his secret treasure, she was his shame and his bliss.
And a chain and a keep are nothing, compared to a woman¡¯s kiss.
Those were all the words he knew, aside from the refrain. Hands of gold are always cold, but a
woman¡¯s hands are warm. Shae¡¯s hands had beat at him as the golden hands dug into her throat. He did
not remember if they¡¯d been warm or not. As the strength went out of her, her blows became moths
fluttering about his face. Each time he gave the chain another twist the golden hands dug deeper. A
chain and a keep are nothing, compared to a woman¡¯s kiss. Had he kissed her one last time, after she
was dead? He could not remember ¡­ though he still recalled the first time they had kissed, in his tent
beside the Green Fork. How sweet her mouth had tasted.
He remembered the first time with Tysha as well. She did not know how, no more than I did. We
kept bumping our noses, but when I touched her tongue with mine she trembled. Tyrion closed his eyes
to bring her face to mind, but instead he saw his father, squatting on a privy with his bed-robe hiked up
about his waist. ¡°Wherever whores go,¡± Lord Tywin said, and the crossbow thrummed.
The dwarf rolled over, pressing half a nose deep into the silken pillows. Sleep opened beneath
him like a well, and he threw himself into it with a will and let the darkness eat him up.
THE MERCHANT¡¯S MAN
Adventure stank.
She boasted sixty oars, a single sail, and a long lean hull that promised speed. Small, but she
might serve, Quentyn thought when he saw her, but that was before he went aboard and got a good
whiff of her. Pigs, was his first thought, but after a second sniff he changed his mind. Pigs had a cleaner
smell. This stink was piss and rotting meat and night-soil, this was the reek of corpse flesh and weeping
sores and wounds gone bad, so strong that it overwhelmed the salt air and fish smell of the harbor.
¡°I want to retch,¡± he said to Gerris Drinkwater. They were waiting for the ship¡¯s master to
appear, sweltering in the heat as the stench wafted up from the deck beneath them.
¡°If the captain smells anything like his ship, he may mistake your vomit for perfume,¡± Gerris
replied.
Quentyn was about to suggest that they try another ship when the master finally made his
appearance, with two vile-looking crewmen at his side. Gerris greeted him with a smile. Though he did
not speak the Volantene tongue as well as Quentyn, their ruse required that he speak for them. Back in
the Planky Town Quentyn had played the wineseller, but the mummery had chafed at him, so when the
Dornishmen changed ships at Lys they had changed roles as well. Aboard the Meadowlark, Cletus
Yronwood became the merchant, Quentyn the servant; in Volantis, with Cletus slain, Gerris had
assumed the master¡¯s role.
Tall and fair, with blue-green eyes, sandy hair streaked by the sun, and a lean and comely body,
Gerris Drinkwater had a swagger to him, a confidence bordering on arrogance. He never seemed ill at
ease, and even when he did not speak the language, he had ways of making himself understood.
Quentyn cut a poor figure by comparison¡ª short-legged and stocky, thickly built, with hair the brown of
new-turned earth. His forehead was too high, his jaw too square, his nose too broad. A good honest
face, a girl had called it once, but you should smile more.
Smiles had never come easily for Quentyn Martell, any more than they did for his lord father.
¡°How swift is your Adventure?¡± Gerris said, in a halting approximation of High Valyrian.
The Adventure¡¯s master recognized the accent and responded in the Common Tongue of
Westeros. ¡°There is none swifter, honored lord. Adventure can run down the wind itself. Tell me where
you wish to sail, and swiftly I shall bring you there.¡±
¡°I seek passage to Meereen for myself and two servants.¡±
That gave the captain pause. ¡°I am no stranger to Meereen. I could find the city again, aye ¡­ but
why? There are no slaves to be had in Meereen, no profit to be found there. The silver queen has put an
end to that. She has even closed the fighting pits, so a poor sailor cannot even amuse himself as he waits
to fill his holds. Tell me, my Westerosi friend, what is there in Meereen that you should want to go
there?¡±
The most beautiful woman in the world, thought Quentyn. My bride-to-be, if the gods are good.
Sometimes at night he lay awake imagining her face and form, and wondering why such a woman would
ever want to marry him, of all the princes in the world. I am Dorne, he told himself. She will want Dorne.
Gerris answered with the tale they had concocted. ¡°Wine is our family trade. My father owns
extensive vineyards back in Dorne, and wishes me to find new markets. It is hoped that the good folk of
Meereen will welcome what I sell.¡±
¡°Wine? Dornish wine?¡± The captain was not convinced. ¡°The slave cities are at war. Can it be
you do not know this?¡±
¡°The fighting is between Yunkai and Astapor, we had heard. Meereen is not involved.¡±
¡°Not as yet. But soon. An envoy from the Yellow City is in Volantis even now, hiring swords. The
Long Lances have already taken ship for Yunkai, and the Windblown and the Company of the Cat will
follow once they have finished filling out their ranks. The Golden Company marches east as well. All this
is known.¡±
¡°If you say so. I deal in wine, not wars. Ghiscari wine is poor stuff, all agree. The Meereenese will
pay a good price for my fine Dornish vintages.¡±
¡°Dead men do not care what kind of wine they drink.¡± The master of Adventure fingered his
beard. ¡°I am not the first captain you have approached, I think. Nor the tenth.¡±
¡°No,¡± Gerris admitted.
¡°How many, then? A hundred?¡±
Close enough, thought Quentyn. The Volantenes were fond of boasting that the hundred isles of
Braavos could be dropped into their deep harbor and drowned. Quentyn had never seen Braavos, but he
could believe it. Rich and ripe and rotted, Volantis covered the mouth of the Rhoyne like a warm wet
kiss, stretching across hill and marsh on both sides of the river. Ships were everywhere, coming down
the river or headed out to sea, crowding the wharves and piers, taking on cargo or off-loading it:
warships and whalers and trading galleys, carracks and skiffs, cogs, great cogs, long-ships, swan ships,
ships from Lys and Tyrosh and Pentos, Qartheen spicers big as palaces, ships from Tolos and Yunkai and
the Basilisks. So many that Quentyn, seeing the port for the first time from the deck of the Meadowlark,
had told his friends that they would only linger here three days.